Colorado, session 2026A, HB1277.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 25-1-136.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-3-1203, repeal
(17)(a)(VI) as follows:
2-3-1203. Sunset review of advisory committees - legislative
declaration - definition - repeal.
(17) (a) The following statutory authorizations for the designated
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

advisory committees will repeal on September 1, 2026:
(VI) The kidney disease prevention and education task force created
in section 25-1-136;
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect September 1, 2026; except that, if a referendum petition is filed
pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state constitution against this act
or an item, section, or part of this act within the ninety-day period after final
adjournment of the general assembly, then the act, item, section, or part will
not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1277

held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1277